Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201475-110.01
Application
or petition for authority or relief; procedures.

A
summary of the authority or relief sought in an application or petition shall
be set out in the notice given according to the rules the commission shall
adopt. After notice of an application or petition has been given as provided
by the rules for notice, the commission may process the application or petition
without a hearing by use of affidavits if the application or petition is not
opposed. The commission shall not deny an application or petition of a common
carrier, pipeline carrier, or
jurisdictional utility until after it has either given the applicant a hearing
thereon, or received the applicant's affidavits and made them a part of the
record.

Laws 1967, c. 479, § 2, p. 1476;

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 64;

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 15.

Railway Commission is required to hold a hearing on an application on a petition unless it is not opposed and its disposition is made by use of affidavits. Allen v. Omaha Transit Co., Inc., 187 Neb. 156, 187 N.W.2d 760 (1971).